Utah statutes.
32A-4-105.   Bond.
(1)  Each restaurant liquor licensee shall post a cash or corporate surety
bond in the penal sum of $10,000 payable to the department, which the licensee
has procured and must maintain for so long as the licensee continues to
operate as a restaurant liquor licensee.
(2)  The bond shall be in a form approved by the attorney general, conditioned
upon the licensee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the
commission.
(3) (a)  If the $10,000 surety bond is canceled due to the licensee's
negligence, a $300 reinstatement fee may be assessed.
(b)  No part of any cash or corporate bond so posted may be withdrawn:
(i)  during the period the license is in effect; or
(ii)  while revocation proceedings are pending against the licensee.
(c)  A bond filed by a licensee may be forfeited if the license is finally
revoked.
